Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5172XS (3) 91 da/js S.F. 2112 Section 1. Section 137.104, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 137F.1, subsection 9, paragraph o, Code 3 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 4 Sec. 3. Section 137F.1, subsection 10, paragraph d, Code 5 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 6 Sec. 4. Section 159.6, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 6. a. Regulation and inspection of foods, drugs, and other 9 articles, as provided in subtitle 4 . However, 10 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , chapter 205 shall be 11 enforced as provided in that chapter. Except as expressly 12 authorized in subtitle 4 , the department shall not regulate any 13 of the following: 14 a. The production, processing, labeling, marketing, or 15 distribution of raw milk by a raw milk producer in compliance 16 with chapter 195 . 17 b. The manufacture, labeling, marketing, or distribution 18 of a raw milk product or raw milk dairy product by a raw milk 19 producer in compliance with chapter 195 . 20 Sec. 5. Section 190.2, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 21 by striking the subsection. 22 Sec. 6. Section 191.2, subsection 5, unnumbered paragraph 23 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 Except as provided in subsection 6 , a A container or package 25 enclosing milk or a milk product shall be conspicuously labeled 26 or marked with all of the following: 27 Sec. 7. Section 191.2, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 28 by striking the subsection. 29 Sec. 8. Section 192.103, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 1. a. Only grade âAâ pasteurized milk and milk products 32 shall be sold to the final consumer, or to restaurants, soda 33 fountains, grocery stores, or similar establishments except as 34 follows: . 35 -1- LSB 5172XS (3) 91 da/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2112 a. b. In Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , in an emergency, 1 the sale of pasteurized milk and milk products that have 2 not been graded, or the grade of which is unknown, may be 3 authorized by the secretary, in which case, such products shall 4 be labeled âungradedâ. 5 b. A raw milk producer may distribute raw milk, or a 6 manufactured raw milk product or raw milk dairy product, in 7 compliance with chapter 195 . 8 Sec. 9. REPEAL. Sections 135.16B, 137D.2A, 137F.8B, and 9 194.22, Code 2026, are repealed. 10 Sec. 10. REPEAL. Chapter 195, Code 2026, is repealed. 11